Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 109
INDEMNIFICATION

Law reviews:

For article, "Risk and Risk Takers: Protecting

C

orporate Executives With D&O Insurance Policies", see 43

C

olo. Law. 39 (Nov. 2014); for article, "Indemnification Provisions in Commercial Contracts: A Drafting Primer", see 49 Colo. Law. 28 (Jan. 2020).

Section

7-109-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 109:

"Corporation" includes any domestic or foreign entity that is a predecessor of a corporation by reason of a merger or other transaction in which the predecessor's existence ceased upon consummation of the transaction.

"Director" means an individual who is or was a director of a corporation or an individual who, while a director of a corporation, is or was serving at the corporation's request as a director, an officer, an agent, an associate, an employee, a fiduciary, a manager, a member, a partner, a promoter, or a trustee of, or in any other capacity with, another person or an employee benefit plan. A director is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation's request if the director's duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the director to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. "Director" includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a deceased director.

"Expenses" includes counsel fees.

"Liability" means the obligation incurred with respect to a proceeding to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine, including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan, or reasonable expenses.

"Official capacity" means, when used with respect to a director, the office of director in a corporation and, when used with respect to a person other than a director as contemplated in section 7-109-107, the office in a corporation held by the officer or the employment, fiduciary, or agency relationship undertaken by the employee, fiduciary, or agent on behalf of the corporation. "Official capacity" does not include service for any other domestic or foreign corporation or other person or employee benefit plan.

"Party" includes a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

"Proceeding" means any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, arbitrative, or investigative and whether formal or informal.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 789, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1319, § 25, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2320, § 246, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1500, § 264, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP, (2), and (7) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1937, § 37, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

7-109-102. Authority to indemnify directors.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a corporation may indemnify an individual made a party to a proceeding, because the individual is or was a director, against liability incurred in the proceeding if:

The individual's conduct was in good faith; and

The individual reasonably believed:

In the case of conduct in an official capacity with the corporation, that the conduct was in the corporation's best interests; and

In all other cases, that the conduct was at least not opposed to the corporation's best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, the individual had no reasonable cause to believe the individual's conduct was unlawful.

A director's conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose the director reasonably believed to be in the interests of the participants in or beneficiaries of the plan is conduct that satisfies the requirement of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section. A director's conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose that the director did not reasonably believe to be in the interests of the participants in or beneficiaries of the plan shall be deemed not to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, or conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent does not, of itself, create a presumption that the director did not meet the relevant standard of conduct described in this section.

A corporation may not indemnify a director under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation in which the director was adjudged liable to the corporation except for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding if it is determined that the director has met the relevant standard of conduct under subsection (1) of this section; or

In connection with any other proceeding charging that the director derived an improper personal benefit, whether or not involving action in an official capacity, in which proceeding the director was adjudged liable on the basis that the director derived an improper personal benefit.

Indemnification permitted under this section in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation is limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 790, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 1500, § 265, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1), (3), and (4)(a) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1937, § 38, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-103. Mandatory indemnification of directors.

Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a corporation shall indemnify an individual who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which the individual was a party because the individual is or was a director, against reasonable expenses incurred by the individual in connection with the proceeding.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 791, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1501, § 266, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1938, § 39, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-104. Advance of expenses to directors.

A corporation may, before final disposition of a proceeding, pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by an individual who is a party to a proceeding because that person is a director if:

The director delivers to the corporation a written affirmation of the director's good faith belief that:

The director has met the relevant standard of conduct described in section 7-109-102; or

The proceeding involves conduct for which liability has been eliminated under a provision in the articles of incorporation as authorized by section 7-102-102 (2)(d); and

The director delivers to the corporation a written undertaking, executed personally or on the director's behalf, to repay any funds advanced if the director is not entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 7-109-103 and it is ultimately determined under section 7-109-105 or 7-109-106 that the director has not met the relevant standard of conduct described in section 7-109-102.

The undertaking required by subsection (1)(b) of this section is an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.

Authorizations of payments under this section shall be made in the manner specified in section 7-109-106.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 791, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1501, § 267, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1938, § 40, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-105. Court-ordered indemnification - advance of expenses.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a director who is or was a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification or an advance of expenses to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. After receipt of an application and after giving any notice the court considers necessary, the court may order indemnification or an advance of expenses in the following manner:

If it determines that the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 7-109-103, the court shall order indemnification, in which case the court shall also order the corporation to pay the director's reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification.

If it determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or an advance of expenses under section 7-109-109 (1), the court shall order indemnification or an advance of expenses, as applicable, in which case the court shall also order the corporation to pay the director's reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification or advance of expenses.

If it determines that the director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification or an advance of expenses in view of all the relevant circumstances, whether or not the director met the standard of conduct set forth in section 7-109-102 (1), failed to comply with section 7-109-104, or was adjudged liable in the circumstances described in section 7-109-102 (4), the court may order such indemnification or advance of expenses as the court deems proper; except that the indemnification with respect to any proceeding in which liability has been adjudged in the circumstances described in section 7-109-102 (4) is limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding and reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 792, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1939, § 41, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-106. Determination and authorization of indemnification of directors.

A corporation may not indemnify a director under section 7-109-102 unless authorized in the specific case after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible in the circumstances because the director has met the standard of conduct set forth in section 7-109-102. A corporation shall not advance expenses to a director under section 7-109-104 unless authorized in the specific case after the written affirmation and undertaking required by section 7-109-104 (1)(a) and (1)(b) are received.

The determinations required by subsection (1) of this section must be made:

If there are two or more disinterested directors, by the board of directors by a majority vote of all the disinterested directors, a majority of whom constitute a quorum for this purpose, or by a majority vote of a committee of the board of directors appointed by such a vote, which committee consists of two or more disinterested directors;

By independent legal counsel selected in the manner specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section or, if there are fewer than two disinterested directors, by independent legal counsel selected by a majority vote of the full board of directors; or

By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time is not a disinterested director may not be voted on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification and an advance of expenses must be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification or an advance of expenses is permissible; except that, if the determination that indemnification or an advance of expenses is permissible is made by independent legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and an advance of expenses must be made by the body that selected the counsel.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 792, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1939, § 42, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-107. Indemnification of officers, employees, fiduciaries, and agents.

An officer is entitled to mandatory indemnification or an advance of expenses under section 7-109-103, and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification or an advance of expenses under section 7-109-105, in each case to the same extent as a director.

A corporation may indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the corporation to the same extent as to a director.

A corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent who is not a director to such further extent as may be provided for by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors or shareholders, or contract. This subsection (3) applies to an officer who is also a director if the basis on which the officer is made a party to the proceeding is an act or omission solely as an officer.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 793, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1940, § 43, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-108. Insurance.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the corporation, or who, while a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, agent, associate, employee, fiduciary, manager, member, partner, promoter, or trustee of, or in any other capacity with, another person or an employee benefit plan, against liability asserted against or incurred by the person in that capacity or arising from the person's status as a director, officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify the person against the same liability under section 7-109-102, 7-109-103, or 7-109-107. Any such insurance may be procured from any insurance company designated by the board of directors, whether the insurance company is formed under the law of this state or any other jurisdiction of the United States or elsewhere, including any insurance company in which the corporation has an equity or any other interest through stock ownership or otherwise.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 793, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2320, § 247, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1501, § 268, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1941, § 44, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-109. Variation by corporate action.

A corporation may, by a provision in its articles of incorporation or bylaws or in a resolution adopted or a contract approved by its board of directors or shareholders, obligate itself in advance of the act or omission giving rise to a proceeding to provide indemnification in accordance with section 7-109-102 or advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with section 7-109-104. Such an obligatory provision:

Satisfies the requirements for authorization, but not determination, referred to in section 7-109-106.

That obligates the corporation to provide indemnification to the fullest extent permitted by law obligates the corporation to advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with section 7-109-104 to the fullest extent permitted by law, unless the provision specifically provides otherwise.

A right of indemnification or to advances of expenses created by this article 109 or under subsection (1) of this section and in effect at the time of an act or omission must not be eliminated or impaired with respect to the act or omission by an amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors or shareholders, adopted after the occurrence of the act or omission, unless, in the case of a right created under subsection (1) of this section, the provision creating the right and in effect at the time of the act or omission explicitly authorizes the elimination or impairment after the act or omission has occurred.

A provision specified in subsection (1) of this section does not obligate the corporation to indemnify or advance expenses to a director of a predecessor of the corporation pertaining to conduct with respect to the predecessor, unless otherwise specifically provided. A provision for indemnification or an advance of expenses in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors or shareholders of a predecessor of the corporation in a merger or in a contract to which the predecessor is a party, existing at the time the merger takes effect, is governed by section 7-90-204 (1).

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a corporation may, by a provision in its articles of incorporation, limit any of the rights to indemnification or an advance of expenses created by or pursuant to this article 109.

Sections 7-109-101 to 7-109-108 do not limit a corporation's power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with an appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the director has not been made a named defendant or respondent in the proceeding.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 794, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1502, § 269, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1941, § 45, effective July 1, 2020.

7-109-110. Notice to shareholders of indemnification of director.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under this article 109 in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall give notice of the indemnification or advance to the shareholders with or before the notice of the next shareholders' meeting. If the next shareholder action is taken without a meeting at the instigation of the board of directors, the corporation shall give the notice to the shareholders at or before the time the first shareholder signs a document consenting to the action.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 794, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 170, § 22, effective April 19.

7-109-111. Exclusivity.

A corporation may provide indemnification or an advance of expenses to a director or an officer only as permitted by this article 109.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1942, § 46, effective July 1, 2020.